Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB574.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1511(b)(1)(i) and (c) of Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1511. Additional powers of certain public utility corporations.* * *(b) Restrictions.--The powers conferred by subsection (a) shall not be exercised:(1) To condemn for the purpose of constructing any street railway, trackless-trolley omnibus, petroleum or petroleum products transportation or aerial electric transmission, aerial telephone or aerial telegraph lines:(i) Any dwelling house or[, except in the case of 123456789101112131415161718 any condemnation for petroleum or petroleum products transportation lines,] any part of the reasonable curtilage of a dwelling house within 100 meters therefrom and not within the limits of any street, highway, water or other public way or place.* * *(c) Public Utility Commission approval.--The powers conferred by subsection (a) may be exercised to condemn property outside the limits of any street, highway, water or other public way or place for the purpose of erecting poles or running wires or other aerial electric, intrastate aerial telephone or intrastate aerial telegraph facilities or for the transportation of petroleum or petroleum products only after the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, upon application of the public utility corporation, has found and determined, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the service to be furnished by the corporation through the exercise of those powers is necessary or proper for the service, accommodation, convenience or safety of the public. The power of the public utility corporation to condemn the subject property or the procedure followed by it shall not be an issue in the commission proceedings held under this subsection, and no court shall entertain any proceeding questioning the jurisdiction of the commission under this subsection. A final order of the commission approving or denying an application under this subsection, including an order involving a question of jurisdiction under this subsection, may be made the subject of any appeal in the manner provided or prescribed by law.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0574PN0574 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930